Illinois, session 104th, HB5029.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $16,358,900, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services Rehabilitation 7Services Bureau for grants to independent living centers. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.